Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 1

Beech River Watershed Development Authority

64-1-101. Legislative findings — Authority creation — Board of directors — Chair — Meetings — Employees.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The tributaries and subtributaries of the major waterways of Tennessee are among the basic resources of the state;

Determination and effectuation of the best means for control of the flood waters of those tributaries and subtributaries, development of their full potential as a domestic, municipal, industrial and agricultural water source and use of their waters and shoreline lands for recreation and industrial development are public purposes essential to the integrated economic development of the areas drained by these streams and to the future economic welfare of the entire state;

Development of the watershed of the Beech River by a local development authority will provide information on problems of water control and development valuable in the formulation of state policy with respect to similar action on larger streams; and

Creation of a local development authority is essential to the achievement of these objectives in the watershed of the Beech River in Decatur and Henderson counties.

There is, therefore, hereby created the Beech River watershed development authority, referred to as “authority” in this part, to exercise the powers granted in this part, in and with respect to the portions of the counties of Decatur and Henderson making up the watershed of the Beech River.

The authority shall be a body politic and corporate and shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of:

The commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's designee, the county mayor of Decatur County or the mayor's designee, and the county mayor of Henderson County or the mayor's designee as ex officio members; and

Five (5) additional members to be appointed by the governor from persons residing in Decatur or Henderson County and to include persons active in municipal, industrial, agricultural and commercial groups concerned with the development of the Beech River watershed. One (1) such member shall be appointed for a three-year term, two (2) for six-year terms and two (2) for nine-year terms, but such terms shall continue in all events until successors are appointed. Their successors shall be appointed by the governor for terms of nine (9) years. Two (2) members shall be appointed from persons residing in Decatur County and three (3) from persons residing in Henderson County. In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor shall appoint a successor for the unexpired term.

The board of directors of the authority shall elect a chair from the voting members of the board for a term of three (3) years or for so long as such person remains a member of the board, whichever is less.

The commissioner shall serve on the board in an advisory capacity without vote. The other members shall each have one (1) vote. The directors shall serve without pay except for actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, such expenses to be reimbursed from such funds as may be available to the authority.

Upon completion of the membership of the board, the members shall meet and organize in Lexington, Tennessee, set a regular time and place for the meetings of the authority, and obtain offices and all necessary equipment for the office.

A member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the board.

The presiding officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of the member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement prescribed in subdivision (e)(2)(A).

The board may employ an executive secretary and such other persons as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes stated in this part and the salary of any such employees may be paid out of such funds as may be available to the authority from any source. The executive secretary is the custodian of funds belonging to the authority and shall keep the records and accounts as may be required by the board. The executive secretary shall also execute a corporate surety bond as prescribed by the board.

Acts 1963, ch. 169, §§ 1, 3; Acts 1963, ch. 343, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., §66-1-101; Acts 1995, ch. 501, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2020, ch. 661, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. The Beech River watershed authority, board of directors, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2028. See §§4-29-112,4-29-249.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (b)(1), which read: “(b)(1) The commissioner of environment and conservation, the county mayor of Decatur County, and the county mayor of Henderson County as ex officio members; and”; substituted “organize in Lexington, Tennessee, set” for “organize at Lexington, set” in (e)(1); added (e)(2) and redesignated the former (e)(2) as (e)(3); and, in the second sentence of (e)(3), substituted “secretary is the custodian” for “secretary shall be the custodian” and “the records” for “such records”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 661, § 7. April 2, 2020.

64-1-102. Powers and duties — Eminent domain — Tax-exempt status.

The authority is specifically authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary in forming and executing a plan for the comprehensive development of the resources of the Beech River watershed, including an action in cooperation, when necessary, with appropriate local, state, and federal agencies, in the fields of agriculture, forestry, drainage and flood control, land reclamation, electric power utilization, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, public health, manufacturing, and trade. To that end the authority:

Shall have succession in its corporate name;

May sue and be sued in its corporate name;

May adopt and use a corporate seal;

May establish, amend and repeal bylaws and make all rules and regulations deemed expedient for the management of its corporate affairs;

May make contracts and execute instruments containing such terms, provisions and conditions as in the judgment of the board of directors may be necessary, proper or advisable in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it in this part, including, but not limited to, contracts for grants, loans or other assistance from any federal agency and contracts with corporations, associations or individuals for construction work in the furtherance of any development project and may carry out and perform the terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

May acquire by purchase, lease, gift or by condemnation property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, that the board deems necessary to the exercise of its powers or functions. Acquisition by condemnation is limited to land, rights in land, including leaseholds and easements, and water rights in the Beech River watershed that, if taken for channel improvement along an unimpounded portion of the Beech River stream system, lie within the present floodplain of the main stream or of a tributary of the Beech River and, if bordering an impoundment or detention reservoir, lie within two thousand six hundred fifty feet (2,650') of the nearest point on the maximum shoreline contour of such impoundment. The amount and character of interests in land, rights in land and water rights to be acquired within either of these boundaries shall be determined by the board of directors, which determination shall be final;

May issue its bonds from time to time in a total amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the purpose of paying in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition of necessary land or interests therein and the development of the resources of the Beech River watershed and expenses incidental thereto; may secure such bonds by a pledge of all or any part of the revenues that may now or hereafter come to the authority from any source, by a mortgage or deed of trust of the authority's land or any part thereof, or by a combination of the two (2); and may make such contracts or covenants in the issuance of such bonds as may be necessary to ensure the marketability thereof;

May arrange with any city, county, municipality or supplier of utilities for the abandonment, relocation or other adjustment of roads, highways, bridges and utility lines;

May enter into contracts with municipalities, corporations, other public agencies or political subdivisions of any kind or with others for the sale of water from reservoirs in the Beech River system under its control for municipal, domestic, agricultural or industrial use or any other services, facilities or commodities that the authority may be in a position to supply;

May develop or provide for the development of residential and commercial property existing within the Beech River system, and may develop reservoirs and shoreline lands for recreational use and provide for their operation or use for this purpose directly or by concessionaires, lessees, or vendees of shoreline lands;

May sell or lease shoreline lands acquired in connection with development of the Beech River system for uses consistent with the authority's development plans and subject to such restrictions as the authority deems necessary for reservoir protection and to such requirements as to:

Character of improvements and activities on the lands; and

Time within which such improvements or activities shall be undertaken as the authority deems appropriate to its overall development plans; and

May manage or operate reservoirs or shoreline lands of reservoirs owned by the United States under appropriate agreements with the federal agency or agencies having custody and control thereof.

The authority's power of eminent domain may be exercised under title 29, chapter 16, or pursuant to any other applicable statutory provisions, now in force or hereafter enacted, for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

At any time on or after the filing of a petition for condemnation of property and before the entry of final judgment, the authority may file with the clerk of the court in which the petition is filed a declaration of taking signed by the duly authorized officer or agent of the authority declaring that all or part of the property described in the petition is being taken for the use of the authority. The declaration of taking is sufficient if it sets forth:

A description of the property, sufficient for the identification thereof, to which there may be attached a plat or map thereof;

A statement of the estate or interest in the property being taken; and

A statement of the sum of money estimated by the authority to be just compensation for the property taken.

At any time prior to the vesting of title to property in the authority, the authority may withdraw or dismiss its petition with respect to any and all of the property described in the petition.

From the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit in court to the use of the persons entitled thereto of the amount of the estimated compensation stated in the declaration, title to the property described as being taken by the declaration shall vest in the authority, free from the right, title, interest or lien of all parties to the cause; and the property shall be deemed to be condemned and taken for the use of the authority, and the right to just compensation for the same shall vest in the persons entitled thereto. Upon the filing of the declaration of taking, the court shall designate a day, not exceeding twenty (20) days after such filing, except upon good cause shown, on which the persons in possession are required to surrender possession to the authority.

The ultimate amount of compensation shall be determined pursuant to title 29, chapter 16. If the amount so fixed exceeds the amount so deposited in the court by the authority or otherwise paid to the persons entitled thereto, the court shall enter judgment against the authority in the amount of such deficiency, together with interest at the legal rate on such deficiency from the date of the vesting of title to the date of entry of the final judgment, subject, however, to abatement for use, income, rents or profits derived from such property by the owner thereof subsequent to the vesting of title in the authority; and the court shall order the authority to deposit the amount of such deficiency in court. Upon the application of the parties in interest, the court may order that the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of just compensation to be awarded in the proceedings. Interest is not allowed on so much of the just compensation as has been paid into court with the declaration of taking. In case the amount deposited in court by the authority as the estimated compensation for the property exceeds the amount of the final award or judgment, such excess shall be returned to the authority.

As an alternative to the procedure provided in subdivisions (b)(2)-(4), the authority may file in the court where condemnation proceedings of the authority are pending an application for a writ of possession, which the court shall, upon the authority's posting a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property condemned, order that a writ of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just.

During the time that title to land or rights in land are held by the authority, they are exempt from all taxes levied by the state or any of its political subdivisions, or instrumentalities of either, and all other property and activities of the authority are similarly exempt.

The authority shall not exercise any broad governmental controls or police powers to regulate land use planning, zoning, subdivision regulations, building codes, or similar powers to regulate land use.

Acts 1963, ch. 343, § 2; T.C.A., §66-1-102; Acts 2013, ch. 149, § 1; 2020, ch. 661, §§ 5, 6.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the introductory language in (a), which read: “(a) The authority is hereby specifically authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary or desirable in forming and executing a plan for the comprehensive development of the resources of the Beech River watershed, including, but not limited to, action in cooperation, when necessary or desirable, with appropriate local, state and federal agencies, in the fields of agriculture, forestry, drainage and flood control, land reclamation, electric power utilization, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, public health, education, manufacturing and trade. To that end the authority:”; and added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 661, § 7. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Rate of post-judgment interest, §47-14-121.

Attorney General Opinions. The Beech River watershed development authority has no authority to contract with a county for the use of county equipment in developing private residences and private roads within a subdivision on lands owned by the authority, OAG 01-070, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 61 (5/2/01).

64-1-103. Cooperation with Tennessee Valley authority and other agencies.

The authority is further authorized to:

Cooperate with the Tennessee Valley authority in a study of engineering works as part of plans for comprehensive development of the Beech River watershed and in a study of the economic effects of such works in terms of agricultural production, industrial locations, trade, land values and county and state tax revenues;

Ascertain the availability of, and obtain to the extent possible, commitments from local interests for financial contributions toward the cost of constructing, operating and maintaining such works;

Negotiate with the Tennessee Valley authority regarding assistance by that agency in planning and financing the works;

Report to the governor on plans that may be developed for constructing, operating and maintaining the projects, including recommendations for further legislation to put such plans into effect; and

Cooperate with other groups authorized to investigate state participation in federal water projects.

All agencies of the state are hereby authorized, empowered and directed to extend their cooperation and assistance to the authority in the formulation and implementation of its program of development.

Acts 1961, ch. 315, § 3; 1963, ch. 343, § 3; T.C.A., §66-1-103.

64-1-104. Local contributions to authority — Tax levy.

Decatur County, Henderson County and any city or town in either county are hereby authorized and empowered to contribute to the work of the Beech River watershed development authority any amount or amounts as recommended by the authority that their respective governing bodies, acting in their sole discretion, shall approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective county or city.

The county legislative bodies and governing bodies of such cities or towns shall be empowered to levy and collect ad valorem taxes for such purposes, which are hereby declared to be for municipal and county public purposes.

Acts 1961, ch. 315, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., §66-1-104.

64-1-105. Creation of position of board member emeritus.

The board of directors of the authority is authorized, by majority vote, to create the position of board member emeritus for the authority.

The position, if created, is intended to honor, and to provide to the authority the benefit of, the knowledge and experience of a qualified individual who has chosen to devote many years to public service and particularly to the Beech River watershed area.

The position of board member emeritus shall be nonvoting and in an advisory capacity but shall otherwise be considered a member of the board for purposes of notice of meetings, board discussion and planning. The member emeritus shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses as provided in § 64-1-101(d).

If the authority creates the position of board member emeritus, it shall then appoint, by majority vote, an emeritus member. The qualifications for appointment to this position are:

At least twenty-five (25) years of service, whether consecutive or not, as a member of the board of directors of the authority;

At least fifteen (15) years of service as the chairman of the authority;

At least ten (10) years of service in the Tennessee general assembly; and

At least four (4) years of service as speaker of either house of the Tennessee general assembly.

Acts 2011, ch. 195, § 1.